src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-A-I-okskasi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  +ero+:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.+fst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.+fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - okska'si - ok : # -m animate intransitive verb, run AEW NA1
     PV/áka+PN/sistsik+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: ákaisistsikókska'siwa
     PV/ikipp+PN/yiistap+okska'si+VAI+Imp+2Sg: kippíístapokska'sit
     PV/iitsiksist+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: iítsiksistokska'siwa
     Fut+PN/isttani+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áaksisttanokska'siwa
     Fut+PN/poohsap+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áaksipoohsapokska'siwa
     Fut+PN/ipiihk+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áaksipiihkókska'siwa
     Fut+PV/ikkam+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áaksíkkamokska'siwa
     okska'si+VAI+Cnj+3Pl: otókska'ssi
     Past+PN/yiistap+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: iiyíístapokska'siwa
     PN/isttani+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: isttanókska'siwa
     PN/isttani+okska'si+VAI+Imp+2Sg: isttanókska'sit
     Past+PN/isam+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: iisamókska'siwa
     PV/it+PV/iksist+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: itsíksistokska'siwa
     PN/ohsohkat+okska'si+VAI+Ind+1Sg: nítohsohkatokska'si
     Fut+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: áakokska'siwa
     Dur+okska'si+VAI+Der/Caus2+VTA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO: nitáókska'sípoka
